src/phonology/kmr-phon.twolc
Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z â ê î ô û ç ş 
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Â Ê Î Ô Û Ç Ş

 %>:0 %^PREF:0 %^VSUF:0 ;

Sets

Vow = a e i o u 
      â ê î ô û ;

Rules 

! dişo^VSUFim --> dişom
! dişo^VSUFin --> dişon
"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending present stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %^VSUF:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

!€ dişo^VSUFim 
!€ dişo000000m

! dişo^VSUFe --> dişo
"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending present stem"
e:0 <=> Vow %^VSUF:0 _ ;

!€ dişo^VSUFe
!€ dişo000000

! dişo^VSUFî --> dişoyî
"Epenthetic 'y' insertion"
%^VSUF:y <=> Vow _ î ;

!î:î <=> Vow %^VSUF:y _ î ;

!€ dişo^VSUFî
!€ dişoy0000î
